District of Columbia statutes.
20-1302

Liability of heir or legatee to creditor.

After an estate has been closed, a claim not barred may be brought against one or more of the persons to whom property has been distributed. An heir or legatee shall not be liable to claimants for any amount in excess of the value of the property distributed to such heir or legatee, valued at the time of distribution or the time of filing suit, whichever is lower. An heir or legatee shall have a right of contribution against other heirs or legatees and, as between them, each shall bear the cost of satisfaction of unbarred claims as if the claim had been satisfied before distribution.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Claim not paid in normal course of administration, rights of recovery from distributee, see § 20-901.
This section is referenced in § 20-901 and § 20-1303.
1981 Ed., § 20-1302.